North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-02 Superintendent of Public Instruction

15.1-02-01.
Superintendent of public instruction — Qualifications.

The qualified electors of this state shall elect a superintendent of public instruction at the appropriate general election. The superintendent must be at least twenty-five years of age on the day of the election and have the qualifications of an elector for that office at all times during the superintendent’s term of office.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 162, § 48; 1999, ch. 196, § 2; 2007, ch. 161, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 161, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

15.1-02-02.
Salary.

The annual salary of the superintendent of public instruction is one hundred twenty-seven thousand seven hundred sixty-eight dollars through June 30, 2022, and one hundred thirty thousand three hundred twenty-three dollars thereafter.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 35, § 26; 1999, ch. 196, § 2; 2001, ch. 13, § 16; 2005, ch. 13, § 18; 2005, ch. 15, § 11; 2007, ch. 40, § 20; 2009, ch. 13, § 18; 2011, ch. 39, § 22; 2013, ch. 13, § 22; 2015, ch. 47, § 17, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 38, § 17, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 13, § 19, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 17 of chapter 47, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 22 of chapter 13, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 22 of chapter 39, S.L. 2011 became effective July 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 18 of chapter 13, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 20 of chapter 40, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

The 2005 amendment of this section by section 18 of chapter 13, S.L. 2005 became effective July 1, 2005.

The 2005 amendment of this section by section 11 of chapter 15, S.L. 2005 became effective July 1, 2005.

Note.

Section 15.1-02-02 was amended 2 times by the 2005 Legislative Assembly.
Section 11 of chapter 15, Session Laws 2005, House Bill 1015 was passed later in time than section 19, chapter 13, Session Laws 2005, House Bill 1013.
Pursuant to section 1-02-09, this section is printed above as found in section 11, chapter 15, Session Laws. 2005, House bill 1015.

15.1-02-03.
Appointment of assistant — Employment of personnel.

The superintendent of public instruction may appoint an assistant. The superintendent may also hire personnel or contract with other persons to perform the work of the department of public instruction.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 35, § 28; 1999, ch. 196, § 2.

15.1-02-04.
Superintendent of public instruction — Duties. [Effective through June 30, 2023]

The superintendent of public instruction:

Shall supervise the provision of elementary and secondary education to the students of this state.

Shall supervise the establishment and maintenance of schools and provide advice and counsel regarding the welfare of the schools.

Shall supervise the development of course content standards.

Shall supervise the assessment of students.

Shall serve as an ex officio member of the board of university and school lands.

Shall keep a complete record of all official acts and appeals.

As appropriate, shall determine the outcome of appeals regarding education matters.

Shall direct school district annexation, reorganization, and dissolution and employ and compensate personnel necessary to enable the state board of public school education to carry out its powers and duties regarding school district annexation, reorganization, and dissolution.

Shall facilitate a process to review and update annually the statewide prekindergarten through grade twelve education strategic vision. The process must include input and participation from a steering committee that includes representatives of all state-level entities receiving state education funding and education stakeholder groups. Each steering committee member entity receiving state education funds shall provide components of the entity’s strategic plan which are aligned to the statewide strategic vision. The steering committee shall prepare a collaborative report of the strategic plans of each committee member entity receiving state education funds. The superintendent shall provide the collaborative report and any updates to the strategic vision to the legislative management during each interim and to a joint meeting of the education standing committees during each regular legislative session.

Shall administer a student loan forgiveness program for individuals teaching at grade levels, in content areas, and in geographical locations identified as having a teacher shortage or critical need.

Shall facilitate the development and implementation of a North Dakota learning continuum in collaboration with the department of career and technical education, upon the recommendation of the kindergarten through grade twelve education coordination council.

Shall collaborate with workforce development stakeholders and the kindergarten through grade twelve education coordination council to determine how best to integrate computer science and cybersecurity into elementary, middle, and high school curriculum under sections 15.1-21-01 and 15.1-21-02. Before September 1, 2022, the superintendent shall provide a report to the legislative management regarding the outcome of this collaboration.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 2; 2019, ch. 145, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 146, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 146, § 2, effective July 1, 2023; 2021, ch. 136, § 3, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 552, § 1, effective November 12, 2021.

Note.

Section 15.1-02-04 was amended 3 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 146, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1429; and Section 1 of Chapter 145, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2025.

15.1-02-04.
Superintendent of public instruction — Duties. [Effective July 1, 2023]

The superintendent of public instruction:

Shall supervise the provision of elementary and secondary education to the students of this state.

Shall supervise the establishment and maintenance of schools and provide advice and counsel regarding the welfare of the schools.

Shall supervise the development of course content standards.

Shall supervise the assessment of students.

Shall serve as an ex officio member of the board of university and school lands.

Shall keep a complete record of all official acts and appeals.

As appropriate, shall determine the outcome of appeals regarding education matters.

Shall direct school district annexation, reorganization, and dissolution and employ and compensate personnel necessary to enable the state board of public school education to carry out its powers and duties regarding school district annexation, reorganization, and dissolution.

Shall facilitate a process to review and update annually the statewide prekindergarten through grade twelve education strategic vision. The process must include input and participation from a steering committee that includes representatives of all state-level entities receiving state education funding and education stakeholder groups. Each steering committee member entity receiving state education funds shall provide components of the entity’s strategic plan which are aligned to the statewide strategic vision. The steering committee shall prepare a collaborative report of the strategic plans of each committee member entity receiving state education funds. The superintendent shall provide the collaborative report and any updates to the strategic vision to the legislative management during each interim and to a joint meeting of the education standing committees during each regular legislative session.

Shall facilitate the development and implementation of a North Dakota learning continuum in collaboration with the department of career and technical education, upon the recommendation of the kindergarten through grade twelve education coordination council.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 2; 2019, ch. 145, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 146, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 146, § 2, effective July 1, 2023; 2021, ch. 136, § 3, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 552, § 1, effective November 12, 2021.

15.1-02-05.
Federal government — Contracts.

The superintendent of public instruction may contract with an agency of the federal government:

For and on behalf of the department of public instruction.

For and on behalf of a school district with the consent of the school district board.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 2.

15.1-02-06.
Preservation of property.

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide for the preservation of all property that the superintendent acquires in an official capacity and which has educational interest and value or which records official acts by the superintendent. At the conclusion of the superintendent’s term of office, the superintendent shall deliver the property to the superintendent’s successor.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 2.

15.1-02-07.
Superintendent of public instruction — Lease of unused real property.

The superintendent of public instruction may lease surplus portions of real property, including buildings and improvements, owned by the state and administered by the superintendent of public instruction at North Dakota vision services — school for the blind and the school for the deaf.

The superintendent may lease the unused portion of a building only after consultation with and adherence to conditions set by the administrator of the state fire and tornado fund.

A lease agreement under this section may not exceed five years.

A lease agreement under this section must provide that:

It is cancelable by the state without liability at the end of any state fiscal biennium; or

It is renewable at the sole discretion of the superintendent of public instruction at the beginning of each fiscal biennium.

The superintendent may set additional terms and conditions for leases under this section.

The attorney general shall review any lease under this section and approve its legal adequacy before its execution.

The superintendent may expend revenues from leases under this section only with legislative approval.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 2; 2001, ch. 257, § 6; 2001, ch. 501, § 3.

15.1-02-08.
Accounting and reporting system — Uniformity.

The superintendent of public instruction shall implement a uniform system for the accounting, budgeting, and reporting of data for all school districts in the state and for all regional education associations governed by chapter 15.1-09.1. The superintendent of public instruction shall designate the software standards to be used by the school districts and by the regional education associations in their accounting, budgeting, and reporting functions.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 2; 2007, ch. 162, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 162, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

15.1-02-09.
School district finance facts report — Contents.

The superintendent of public instruction shall submit an annual report on the financial condition of school districts to the governor, legislative council, and the secretary of state by the end of February. The secretary of state shall transmit the report to the state archivist for official and public use. The report must include:

The number of school districts in the state.

The financial condition of each school district, including its receipts and expenditures.

The value of all property owned or controlled by each school district.

The cost of education in each school district.

The number of teachers employed by each school district and their salaries.

The number of students in average daily membership, in weighted average daily membership, and in average daily attendance, in each school district, the grades in which the students are enrolled, and, when applicable, the courses in which the students are enrolled.

Information regarding the state’s approved nonpublic schools.

Other statistical data on public education in the state.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 2; 2005, ch. 152, § 1; 2007, ch. 163, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 163, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

The 2005 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 152, S.L. 2005 became effective August 1, 2005.

15.1-02-10.
School district finance facts report — Distribution.

The superintendent of public instruction shall make the annual school district finance facts report available to each member of the legislative assembly upon request. The superintendent shall provide eight copies of the report to the state library. The superintendent shall make the report available to the public on the superintendent of public instruction’s website.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 2; 2005, ch. 152, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2005 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 152, S.L. 2005 became effective August 1, 2005.

15.1-02-11.
Superintendent of public instruction — Accreditation of schools — Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules governing the accreditation of public and nonpublic schools. Any rule adopted under this section must incorporate measures of student achievement and bear a direct relationship to improving student achievement.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 2; 2011, ch. 131, § 1.

15.1-02-12.
Expiration of existing rules.

Any rule adopted by the superintendent of public instruction in a manner other than that set forth in chapter 28-32 is ineffective after October 31, 1999. For purposes of this section, “rule” includes any regulation, standard, guideline, statement, or policy that has the effect of law or which has either direct or indirect financial consequences for noncompliance.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 2.

15.1-02-13.
School district employee compensation report.

Before September eleventh of each year, each school district shall report the following information to the superintendent of public instruction, with respect to each teacher and class of teachers and with respect to each administrator and class of administrators:

The number of days each was employed during the preceding school year.

The base salaries.

The amount of compensation provided for extended contracts.

The amount of compensation provided for cocurricular activities.

The amount expended for contract buyouts.

The amount of compensation provided in lieu of salaries.

The amount paid for signing bonuses.

The amount of compensation provided for substitute teaching and workload adjustment.

The amount of compensation provided for any other purposes.

The amount expended for health insurance benefits.

The amount expended for dental, vision, and cancer insurance benefits.

The amount expended for life and long-term disability insurance benefits.

The amount of retirement contributions and assessments, including individual shares if paid by the district.

The district’s share of Federal Insurance Contributions Act taxes.

The amount of dues or membership fees paid by the district.

Any other benefits provided by the district.

In addition to the requirements of subsection 1, each school district shall also indicate:

Whether each teacher and administrator is employed on a full-time or a part-time basis.

The number of days used to determine the base salary of each teacher and administrator.

The superintendent of public instruction shall:

Compile the information required by this section in a manner that allows for accurate comparisons; and

Forward a copy of the compiled information to the governor and the legislative council.

The superintendent of public instruction may not expand the reporting requirements of this section.

If any school district fails without good cause to provide the information required by this section on or before September tenth and in the manner directed by the superintendent of public instruction, the superintendent shall withhold all state aid until the information is received.

For purposes of this section:

“Administrator” includes an individual who is employed by a school district in an administrative position and who is classified by the superintendent of public instruction as:

A class 67 school district superintendent;

A class 66 assistant or associate superintendent;

A class 53 principal;

A class 05 assistant principal;

A class 29 director, including a special education director and a career and technical education director;

A class 04 assistant director; and

Any other individual whose position requires an administrator’s credential.

“Teacher” means an individual, other than an administrator, who is licensed to teach by the education standards and practices board or approved to teach by the education standards and practices board and who is employed by the board of a school district in a position classified by the superintendent of public instruction as:

A class 22 coordinator;

A class 37 guidance counselor or school counselor;

A class 38 guidance counselor designate;

A class 40 instructional programmer;

A class 41 library media specialist;

A class 56 pupil personnel service provider;

A class 59 school psychologist;

A class 62 speech-language pathologist;

A class 68 supervisor;

A class 70 teacher or special education teacher; or

A class 72 tutor in training.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 173, § 6; 2003, ch. 138, § 48; 2003, ch. 145, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 9.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 482, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

The 2003 amendment of this section by section 48 of chapter 138, S.L. 2003 became effective August 1, 2003.

The 2003 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 145, S.L. 2003 became effective August 1, 2003.

Note.

Section 15.1-02-13 was amended two times by the 2003 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 48 of chapter 138, Session Laws 2003, House Bill 1183, and section 1 of chapter 145, Session Laws 2003, House Bill 1295.

15.1-02-14.
Duplicative payments — Transfer — Distribution.

If the superintendent of public instruction receives any federal or other moneys to pay programmatic administrative expenses for which the superintendent received a state general fund appropriation, the superintendent shall transfer the moneys to the state tuition fund. This section does not apply if the superintendent is required by federal law or by the terms of a grant to employ additional personnel.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 174, § 1; 2007, ch. 63, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 63, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

15.1-02-15.
Every Student Succeeds Act — Information required.

Whenever the superintendent of public instruction determines any bill or amendment under consideration by an interim committee of the legislative management or by a standing committee or a conference committee of the legislative assembly contains a provision required by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015 [Pub. L. 114-95; 114 Stat. 1177; 20 U.S.C. 28, et seq.] or by federal regulations promulgated to implement that Act, the superintendent shall provide the members of the appropriate committee with the specific language of the Every Student Succeeds Act which sets forth the requirement, together with the statutory citation for that language, or the specific language of the federal regulations which sets forth the requirement, together with the citation for the regulations.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 146, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 10; 2019, ch. 147, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

15.1-02-16.
Superintendent of public instruction — Issuance of credentials to teachers and administrators.

The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules governing the issuance of:

Credentials for teachers of driver’s education;

Credentials for teachers of early childhood special education;

Credentials for elementary school principals;

Credentials for teachers of students who are emotionally disturbed;

Credentials for teachers of students who are gifted and talented;

Credentials for secondary school principals;

Credentials for library media;

Credentials for teachers of title I;

Credentials for teachers of students who have intellectual disabilities;

Credentials for teachers of students who are physically disabled;

Credentials for coordinators of programs for students with limited English proficiency;

Credentials for school counselors;

Credentials for special education directors;

Credentials for special education strategists;

Credentials for teachers of students who have specific learning disabilities;

Credentials for superintendents;

Credentials for teachers of students who have vision impairments;

Credentials for teachers of students who are deaf or hard of hearing;

Credentials for specialists trained in dyslexia;

Credentials for teachers of computer and cyber science;

Certificates of completion for special education technicians;

Certificates of completion for paraprofessionals; and

Certificate of completion for school health technicians.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 147, § 1; 2011, ch. 207, § 1; 2019, ch. 148, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 13, § 20, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 137, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 138, § 1, effective March 26, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 207, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

This section became effective August 1, 2003.

Note.

Section 15.1-02-16 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 20 of Chapter 13, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1013; Section 1 of Chapter 137, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1131; and Section 1 of Chapter 138, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1188.

15.1-02-16.1.
Teacher qualifications — Accreditation rules — Directives.

For purposes of accreditation, the superintendent of public instruction may not establish teacher qualification requirements that exceed those established by the education standards and practices board.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 157, § 8.

Note.

This section became effective August 1, 2003.

15.1-02-16.2.
Credentials for teachers and coordinators of title I.

The superintendent of public instruction shall create a process to reinstate and recertify title I credentials for individuals in the state who held a valid certification, issued by the department of public instruction, as of July 1, 2018, and continue the process in perpetuity. A school district may advertise employment for a title I certified teacher each year until the position is filled. The board of a school district may authorize the hiring of a teacher who is not certified as a title I teacher for the school year if the school district fails to receive applications from qualified applicants to fill the advertised position by July 1.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

15.1-02-17.
State accountability plan — Legislative review.

Before the superintendent of public instruction may submit to the United States secretary of education any proposed changes in the state accountability plan required under the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015 [Pub. L. 114-95; 114 Stat. 1177; 20 U.S.C. 28 et seq.], the superintendent shall present the proposed changes to an interim committee designated by the legislative management. The committee shall review the proposed changes; accept testimony and documentary evidence regarding the impact of the proposed changes on the students, schools, school districts, and taxpayers of this state; and provide advice and recommendations regarding the proposed changes to the superintendent.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 498, § 1; 2019, ch. 147, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2005.

15.1-02-18.
Statewide longitudinal data system committee — Membership — Powers and duties — Report to interim committee — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 21, § 8; 2009, ch. 49, § 10; 2011, ch. 127, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 141, § 9, effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-02-18.1.
Statewide longitudinal data system — Information technology department — Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 127, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 141, § 9, effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-02-18.2.
State agencies — Mandatory provision of information — Confidentiality. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 127, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 141, § 9, effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-02-19.
Health insurance programs — Joint enrollment program. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The superintendent of public instruction and the department of human services jointly shall develop a system under which families of children enrolling in the public school system are provided with information regarding state and federally funded health insurance programs and encouraged to apply for such coverage if determined to be eligible.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 3.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

15.1-02-19.
Health insurance programs — Joint enrollment program. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The superintendent of public instruction and the department of health and human services jointly shall develop a system under which families of children enrolling in the public school system are provided with information regarding state and federally funded health insurance programs and encouraged to apply for such coverage if determined to be eligible.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 3; 2021, ch. 352, § 68, effective September 1, 2022.

15.1-02-20.
Education stabilization fund dollars — Notification of nonreplacement — Publication of notice. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 4; repealed by 2021, ch. 139, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-02-21.
North Dakota teacher of the year award — Selection — Announcement.

Annually, the superintendent of public instruction shall accept nominations for the North Dakota teacher of the year award.

The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and publish the criteria by which all nominees must be considered and shall appoint an eight-member committee to review the nominations and select the North Dakota teacher of the year. The committee must consist of:

A former North Dakota teacher of the year award recipient;

A representative of the North Dakota council of educational leaders;

A representative of the North Dakota department of career and technical education;

A representative of the North Dakota department of public instruction;

A representative of North Dakota united;

A representative of the North Dakota school boards association; and

A representative of nonpublic schools in this state.

By September thirtieth of each year, the governor and the superintendent of public instruction shall jointly announce the award recipient and serve as the exclusive hosts of a ceremony and reception honoring the teacher of the year. The ceremony and reception must take place in the memorial hall of the state capitol or, if requested by the award recipient, at a location in the municipality within which the recipient resides or works.

Must have graduated from an accredited teacher preparation program and signed a contract to teach at a grade level or in a content area and in a geographical location identified by the superintendent as having an existing teacher shortage or critical need; and

Must have an existing student loan.

For purposes of this section, the definitions of rural school district and remote town school district have the same meaning as the definitions under the national center for education statistics locale codes.

If an individual is receiving loan forgiveness under any other provision, the individual may not receive loan forgiveness under this section during the same application year.

Subject to appropriation, an eligible individual may receive loan forgiveness under the program as follows:

If the individual accepts one of up to five positions of critical need in a nonrural school district or nonremote town school district, the individual may receive up to three thousand dollars per year for a maximum of four consecutive years.

If the individual accepts a position in a rural school district or remote town school district with an enrollment of fewer than one thousand students, the individual may receive up to four thousand five hundred dollars per year for a maximum of four consecutive years.

If the individual accepts one of up to five positions of critical need in a rural school district or remote town school district with an enrollment of fewer than one thousand students, the individual may receive up to six thousand five hundred dollars per year for a maximum of four consecutive years.

The superintendent shall consider all applications under this section based on the number of unfilled school vacancies, prioritized by critical need and geographic location.

Upon notification the individual has completed a full year of teaching in a school district, state- supported school, or nonpublic school in this state at a grade level or in a content area and in a geographical location identified by the superintendent as one in which a teacher shortage or critical need exists, the superintendent shall distribute funds directly to the lending institution of the individual to repay outstanding loan principal balances on behalf of eligible applicants. The superintendent shall terminate loan forgiveness payments to eligible individuals if the loan principal balance of the eligible individual is paid in full.

The superintendent shall administer the program only for eligible individuals receiving teacher loan forgiveness benefits for the 2018-19 school year. The superintendent shall provide benefits under this program to eligible individuals until the individual has received the maximum benefit under this section or has become ineligible to receive benefits under the program.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 128, § 1; 2017, ch. 129, § 6, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2011.

15.1-02-22
Loans — Teacher shortages — Loan forgiveness.
[Expired effective July 1, 2022]

1.

The superintendent of public instruction shall administer a student loan forgiveness program for individuals teaching at grade levels, in content areas, and in geographical locations identified as having a teacher shortage or critical need. The superintendent may approve loan forgiveness for no more than two teachers per year in a school district. The superintendent shall adopt rules to implement the program.

2.

The superintendent annually shall identify grade levels, content areas, and geographical locations in which a teacher shortage or critical need exists.

3.

To be eligible for loan forgiveness under this section, an individual:

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 146, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

15.1-02-22
Loans — Teacher shortages — Loan forgiveness.
[Expired effective July 1, 2022]

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 146, § 3, effective July 1, 2019; expired pursuant to 2019, ch. 146, § 8, effective July 1, 2022.